Utah statutes.
78B-6-1217.   Referees' expenses and fees -- Apportionment.

The expenses of the referees, including those of the surveyor and his assistants if employed, must be determined and allowed by the court, and the amount, together with the fees allowed by the court in its discretion to the referees, shall be apportioned equitably among the different parties to the action.

